Louisiana, session 2026, HB360.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 41 in Pearl River, Louisiana,
beginning at the intersection of Louisiana Highway 41 and Lock 1 Road and ending at the
intersection of Louisiana Highway 41 and Louisiana Highway 36 shall be known and is
hereby designated as the "Sgt. Michael J. Guillory Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby directed
to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation, provided local or
private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs for
material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum
of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1